Nebraska, session 109, LB536.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB536 LB536
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 8 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Manufacturing Modernization Pilot Investment Act.
Sec. 2. The purpose of the Manufacturing Modernization Pilot
Investment Act is to partner with the manufacturing sector by providing
one-time grants to eligible manufacturing operations to assist such
operations with capital investments in qualified investments that will
increase, and lead to the adoption and integration of, smart technologies
and increased productivity in existing manufacturing operations located
in this state and that will provide a positive economic impact in the
State of Nebraska.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Manufacturing Modernization Pilot
Investment Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Economic Development;
(2) Eligible manufacturing operation means a manufacturer of goods
at a facility located in this state that:
(a) Has a North American Industry Classification System number
within the manufacturing sector range of 31 to 33;
(b) Has been an established business for a minimum of three years
prior to the date of application for the grant;
(c) Derives a minimum of fifty-one percent of the manufacturer's
gross revenue from the sale of manufactured goods;
(d) Employs a minimum of three full-time employees; and
(e) Demonstrates the ability to provide private matching financial
support for the manufacturer's manufacturing modernization investment
project on a one-to-one basis;
(3) Grant means a manufacturing modernization investment grant
issued under the Manufacturing Modernization Pilot Investment Act in an
amount up to, but not to exceed, two hundred fifty thousand dollars from
the Manufacturing Modernization Pilot Investment Fund;
(4) Manufacturing modernization investment project means a project
that is intended to lead to the adoption and integration of smart
-2-

LB536 LB536
2025 2025
technologies into existing manufacturing operations located in the state
by mitigating the risk to the manufacturer of significant technology
investments. Manufacturing modernization investment project includes, but
is not limited to, an investment in specialized hardware, software, or
other equipment intended to assist a manufacturer in increasing the
manufacturer's productivity, efficiency, and competitiveness; and
(5) Private matching financial support means any financial support
derived from a source other than a direct appropriation from the State of
Nebraska or its political subdivisions.
Sec. 4. (1) Beginning October 1, 2025, through November 1, 2025, an
eligible manufacturing operation may apply to the department for a grant.
The application shall include, but not be limited to, the following
information:
(a) A description of the manufacturing modernization investment
project;
(b) The estimated cost of the manufacturing modernization investment
project; and
(c) Documentation on the amount of private matching financial
support available for the manufacturing modernization investment project
that have been received or will be received by the eligible manufacturing
operation. Such amount shall be at least equal to the amount of any grant
received under the act. The documentation provided under this subdivision
does not need to identify any provider of private matching financial
support.
(2) The department shall consider applications in the order in which
they are received. If an applicant is an eligible manufacturing operation
and otherwise qualifies for a grant, the department shall, subject to
subsection (3) of this section, approve the application and notify the
applicant of the approval.
(3) The department may approve applications within the limits of
available funding under the Manufacturing Modernization Pilot Investment
-3-

LB536 LB536
2025 2025
Act. The amount of any grant approved shall be equal to the amount of
money supplied by the eligible manufacturing operation from providers of
private matching financial support, as documented under subdivision (1)
(c) of this section, except that no grant shall be for more than two
hundred fifty thousand dollars.
Sec. 5. (1) The department shall not approve an application for a
manufacturing modernization investment project that was commenced prior
to the date of the application.
(2) Any eligible manufacturing operation that no longer meets the
requirements of subdivision (2) of section 3 of this act shall repay any
grant funds received under the Manufacturing Modernization Pilot
Investment Act.
Sec. 6. The Manufacturing Modernization Pilot Investment Fund is
created. The fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the
Legislature and any gifts, grants, or bequests from any source, including
federal, state, public, and private sources. The fund shall be
administered by the department and shall be used to provide grants under
the Manufacturing Modernization Pilot Investment Act. Any money in the
fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 7. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate [XXXX]
dollars from the General Fund for purposes of carrying out the
Manufacturing Modernization Pilot Investment Act.
Sec. 8. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Manufacturing Modernization Pilot Investment
Act.
Sec. 9. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-